Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.450

Abandonment—Conduct of election—Canvass.

The sufficiency of the petition for the abandonment of the commission form of city government shall be determined, the election ordered and conducted, the returns canvassed and the results declared as required by the provisions applicable to the proceedings for the enactment of an ordinance by initiative petition to the extent to which they are appropriate.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.450. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 23, part; RRS s 9112, part.]